Washington statutes.
RCW 43.70.327

Public health supplemental account—Annual statement.

(1) The public health supplemental account is created in the state treasury. All receipts from gifts, bequests, devises, or funds, whose use is determined to further the purpose of maintaining and improving the health of Washington residents through the public health system, and all receipts from breast cancer awareness special license plate fees collected under *RCW 46.17.220(1)(e), must be deposited into the account. Money in the account may be spent only after appropriation. Expenditures from the account may be used only for maintaining and improving the health of Washington residents through the public health system, which may include funding for staff[,] and as specified under RCW 46.68.425(2).

(2) The department shall file an annual statement of the financial condition, transactions, and affairs of any program funded under this section in a form and manner prescribed by the office of financial management. A copy of the annual statement shall be filed with the speaker of the house of representatives and the president of the senate.

[ 2014 c 94 s 1; 2014 c 77 s 4; 2001 c 80 s 3.]

NOTES:

Reviser's note: *(1) RCW 46.17.220 was amended by 2018 c 67 s 4, changing subsection (1)(e) to subsection (4), effective January 1, 2019.

(2) This section was amended by 2014 c 77 s 4 and by 2014 c 94 s 1, each without reference to the other. Both amendments are incorporated in the publication of this section under RCW 1.12.025(2). For rule of construction, see RCW 1.12.025(1).

Effective date—2014 c 77: See note following RCW 46.18.200.

Findings—Intent—2001 c 80: See note following RCW 43.70.040.